Maryland, session 2026, HB0265.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Government
7–303.
The Secretary of State shall establish and administer an Address Confidentiality
Program for survivors of threatened, attempted, or actual domestic violence, sexual assault,
stalking, harassment, or human trafficking.
7–309.
(a) (1) Each local board of elections shall use a Program participant’s actual
address for all election–related purposes, INCLUDING ABSENTEE BALLOTS.
(2) A Program participant may not use the substitute address designated
by the Secretary of State as the Program participant’s address for voter registration
purposes.
– 1 –

Ch. 108 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(b) A local board of elections may not make a Program participant’s address
contained in voter registration records available for public inspection or copying except:
(1) on request by a law enforcement agency for law enforcement purposes;
and
(2) as directed by a court order to disclose the address.
(C) (1) THE STATE BOARD OF ELECTIONS SHALL DESIGNATE A CONTACT
PERSON FOR THE PROGRAM.
(2) THE CONTACT PERSON SHALL ACT AS CONTACT FOR INQUIRIES
ABOUT THE PROGRAM FROM LOCAL BOARDS OF ELECTIONS AND PROGRAM
PARTICIPANTS ON MATTERS RELATED TO IMPLEMENTATION OF THIS SECTION.
(D) THE STATE BOARD OF ELECTIONS MAY ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY
OUT THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, April 14, 2026.
– 2 –